Nebraska, session 109, LB316A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB316A LB316A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $441,686 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $84,798 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 to the Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 316, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $41,300
for FY2025-26 or $42,700 for FY2026-27.
-2-